Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-618.02
Electric personal assistive mobility device, defined.

Electric personal assistive mobility device shall mean a self-balancing, two-nontandem-wheeled device, designed to transport only one person and containing an electric propulsion system with an average power of seven hundred fifty watts or one horsepower, whose maximum speed on a paved level surface, when powered solely by such a propulsion system and while being ridden by an operator who weighs one hundred seventy pounds, is less than twenty miles per hour.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 449.